Mississippi, session 2026, HB1437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The State Department of Health shall provide an annual report to the Legislature by December 31 of each year which identifies the locations of food deserts within the State of Mississippi and provides information about health issues associated with food deserts.  If the annual report contains information from the federal government which identifies the locations of food deserts in the state, and provides information on health issues associated with food deserts, then the requirements of this section are satisfied.  For the purposes of this section, the term "food desert" means an area with a poverty rate of at least twenty percent (20%) where at least one-third (1/3) of the population lives more than a mile from a supermarket or large grocery store, farmers' market or healthy food provider, which results in the area being void of fresh fruit, vegetables and other healthful whole foods due, in part, to a lack of access and availability. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.